Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1083.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3215(a) of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 3215. Well location restrictions.(a) [General rule] Restrictions.--Wells may not be drilled within 200 feet, or, in the case of an unconventional gas well, [500] 2,500 feet, measured horizontally from the vertical well bore to a building or water well, existing when the copy of the plat is mailed as required by section 3211(b) (relating to well permits) without written consent of the owner of the building or water well. Unconventional gas wells may not be drilled within [1,000] 2,500 feet measured horizontally from the vertical well bore to any existing water well, surface water intake[, 123456789101112131415161718 reservoir] or other water supply extraction point used by a water purveyor without the written consent of the water purveyor or within 5,000 feet from a reservoir. If consent is not obtained and the distance restriction would deprive the owner of the oil and gas rights of the right to produce or share in the oil or gas underlying the surface tract, the well operator shall be granted a variance from the distance restriction upon submission of a plan identifying the additional measures, facilities or practices as prescribed by the department to be employed during well site construction, drilling and operations. The variance shall include additional terms and conditions required by the department to ensure safety and protection of affected persons and property, including insurance, bonding, indemnification and technical requirements. Notwithstanding section 3211(e), if a variance request has been submitted, the department may extend its permit review period for up to 15 days upon notification to the applicant of the reasons for the extension.(b) Limitation.--* * *(3.1) No well may be drilled within 5,000 feet of a school or hospital on or after the effective date of this paragraph.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1083PN1297 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425